Utah statutes.
67-4a-211.   Gift certificates -- Credit memos -- Gift cards.

Notwithstanding that one or more of the following remain unreconsidered, it may not be considered abandoned for purposes of this chapter:

(1)  a gift certificate;

(2)  a gift card; or

(3)  a credit memo.



Amended by Chapter 343, 2009 General Session

